Utah statutes.
20A-5-403.   Polling places -- Booths -- Ballot boxes -- Inspections --
Arrangements.
(1)  Each election officer shall:
(a)  designate polling places for each voting precinct in the jurisdiction;
and
(b)  obtain the approval of the county or municipal legislative body or local
district governing board for those polling places.
(2) (a)  For each polling place, the election officer shall provide:
(i)  an American flag;
(ii)  a sufficient number of voting booths or compartments;
(iii)  the voting devices, voting booths, ballots, ballot boxes, ballot
labels, ballot sheets, write-in ballots, and any other records and supplies
necessary to enable a voter to vote;
(iv)  the constitutional amendment cards required by Part 1, Election Notices
and Instructions;
(v)  voter information pamphlets required by Title 20A, Chapter 7, Part 7,
Voter Information Pamphlet;
(vi)  the instruction cards required by Section 20A-5-102; and
(vii)  a sign, to be prominently displayed in the polling place, indicating
that valid voter identification is required for every voter before the voter
may vote and listing the forms of identification that constitute valid voter
identification.
(b)  Each election officer shall ensure that:
(i)  each voting booth is at a convenient height for writing, and is arranged
so that the voter can prepare his ballot screened from observation;
(ii)  there are a sufficient number of voting booths or voting devices to
accommodate the voters at that polling place; and
(iii)  there is at least one voting booth or voting device that is configured
to accommodate persons with disabilities.
(c)  Each county clerk shall provide a ballot box for each polling place that
is large enough to properly receive and hold the ballots to be cast.
(3) (a)  All polling places shall be physically inspected by each county clerk
to ensure access by a person with a disability.
(b)  Any issues concerning inaccessibility to polling places by a person with
a disability discovered during the inspections referred to in Subsection
(3)(a) or reported to the county clerk shall be:
(i)  forwarded to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor; and
(ii)  within six months of the time of the complaint, the issue of
inaccessibility shall be either:
(A)  remedied at the particular location by the county clerk;
(B)  the county clerk shall designate an alternative accessible location for
the particular precinct; or
(C)  if no practical solution can be identified, file with the Office of the
Lieutenant Governor a written explanation identifying the reasons compliance
cannot reasonably be met.
(4) (a)  The municipality in which the election is held shall pay the cost of
conducting each municipal election, including the cost of printing and
supplies.
(b) (i)  Costs assessed by a county clerk to a municipality under this section
shall not exceed the actual costs incurred by the county clerk.
(ii)  The actual costs shall include:
(A)  costs of or rental fees associated with the use of election equipment and
supplies; and
(B)  reasonable and necessary administrative costs.
(5)  The county clerk shall make detailed entries of all proceedings had under
this chapter.
